Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.120

Third-party acceptance of authority of guardian or conservator.

(1) A person must not recognize the authority of a guardian or conservator to act on behalf of an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship if:

(a) The person has actual knowledge or a reasonable belief that the letters of office of the guardian or conservator are invalid or the conservator or guardian is exceeding or improperly exercising authority granted by the court; or

(b) The person has actual knowledge that the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship is subject to physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by the guardian or conservator or a person acting for or with the guardian or conservator.

(2) A person may refuse to recognize the authority of a guardian or conservator to act on behalf of an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship if:

(a) The guardian's or conservator's proposed action would be inconsistent with this chapter; or

(b) The person makes, or has actual knowledge that another person has made, a report to the department of children, youth, and families or the department of social and health services stating a good faith belief that the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship is subject to physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by the guardian or conservator or a person acting for or with the guardian or conservator.

(3) A person that refuses to accept the authority of a guardian or conservator in accordance with subsection (2) of this section may report the refusal and the reason for refusal to the court. The court on receiving the report shall consider whether removal of the guardian or conservator or other action is appropriate.

(4) A guardian or conservator may petition the court to require a third party to accept a decision made by the guardian or conservator on behalf of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(5) If the court determines that a third party has failed to recognize the legitimate authority of a guardian or conservator, or requires a third party to accept a decision made by the guardian on behalf of the individual subject to guardianship, the court may order that third party to compensate the guardian or conservator, for the time spent only to the extent the court determines the opposition was reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the individual subject to guardianship.

[ 2020 c 312 s 313; 2019 c 437 s 124.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.